Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1014
Several attachments of same property; inventory and appraisement.

Different attachments of the same property may be made by the same officer, and one inventory and appraisement shall be sufficient, and it shall not be necessary to return the same with more than one order.

R.S.1867, Code § 209, p. 427;

R.S.1913, § 7743;

C.S.1922, § 8687;

C.S.1929, § 20-1014;

R.S.1943, § 25-1014.

One appraisement is sufficient. Connelly and Duffy v. Edgerton and Miller, 22 Neb. 82, 34 N.W. 76 (1887).